Arkansas, session 2025, HB1078.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 7-5-704 is amended to read as follows:
7-5-704. Votes for legislative, judicial, and executive officers — Tie
vote Runoff election.
(a)(1) It shall be the duty of the Secretary of State, in the presence
of the Governor, within thirty (30) days after the time allowed in this
subchapter to make returns of elections by the county board of election
commissioners, or sooner, if all the returns have been received, to cast up
and arrange the votes from the several counties for each person who received
votes for any legislative, judicial, or executive office, except the offices
named in Arkansas Constitution, Article 6, § 3.
(2) The persons who have received the greatest number of legal
votes for Justice of the Supreme Court and Commissioner of State Lands,
within the state; judges Judges of the Court of Appeals and of the circuit
courts, and prosecuting attorneys, in their respective districts or circuits;
*MBM047*
01-23-2025 09:26:30 MBM047

As Engrossed: H1/23/25 HB1078
judges of the county and probate courts, circuit clerk, county clerk,
sheriff, coroner, surveyor, and assessor, in their respective counties; and
all other officers required by law, shall be commissioned by the Governor.
(b)(1) If two (2) or more persons have an equal number of votes for
the same office and a higher number than any other person If there are more
than two (2) candidates for election as a member of the Senate or the House
of Representatives at a general election held in this state and no candidate
for the Senate or the House of Representatives receives a majority of the
votes cast for the office, the names of the two (2) candidates receiving the
highest number of votes for any legislative or executive the office, except
those offices named in Arkansas Constitution, Article 6, § 3, and constables,
shall be certified to a special runoff election which shall be held four (4)
weeks from the day on which the general election is held.
(2)(A) The Except as provided in subdivision (b)(2)(B) of this
section, the special runoff election shall be conducted in the same manner as
is now provided by law, and the election results thereof shall be canvassed
and certified in the manner provided by law.
(B) All polling sites in the district of the two (2)
candidates for election as a member of the General Assembly that are
designated for the general election preceding the special runoff election
shall be used for the special runoff election.
(3) If at the conclusion of the special runoff election the two
(2) candidates for election as a member of the Senate or the House of
Representatives have an equal number of votes, the State Board of Election
Commissioners shall determine the winner of the special runoff election by
lot at an open public meeting and in the presence of the two (2) candidates.
(c) Subsection (b) of this section shall not apply to the offices of:
(1) Governor;
(2) Lieutenant Governor;
(3) Secretary of State;
(4) Treasurer of State;
(5) Auditor of State;
(6) Attorney General;
(7) Commissioner of State Lands;
(8) Justice of the Supreme Court,;
(9) Judge of the Court of Appeals,;
01-23-2025 09:26:30 MBM047

As Engrossed: H1/23/25 HB1078
(10) circuit Circuit judge,; or
(11) district District judge;
(12) Prosecuting attorney; or
(13) Constable.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 7-5-705(a), concerning votes for
constitutional officers, is amended to read as follows:
(a) During the first week of the session after each election for
Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Secretary of State, Treasurer of State,
Auditor of State, and Attorney General, and Commissioner of State Lands, and
in the presence of both houses of the General Assembly, the Speaker of the
House of Representatives shall open and publish the votes cast and given for
each of the respective officers previously mentioned.

/s/Long





















01-23-2025 09:26:30 MBM047